Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 5. Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen Under Laws 1930, Chapter 55.
§ 21-29-249.
Refunds.

Any member of the fire and/or police department who ceases to be an employee before becoming eligible to receive either a service or disability allowance, as provided by this article, may request in writing to the board of disability and relief for a refund, but without interest, which he shall be paid within one year of the filing of the request.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-18; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 16; Laws, 1948, ch. 421; Laws, 1966, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 575, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch 513, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1971.

§ 21-29-251.
Alternative program; retirement benefits.

Any municipality which has a population in excess of twenty thousand according to the 1970 federal decennial census and which lies within any Class 1 county touching the Mississippi River, located wholly within the Yazoo-Mississippi Delta Levee District and which has an approximate land area of five hundred seventy square miles, is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to adopt the following retirement program for policemen and firemen as an alternative to the program established in Sections 21-29-245 through 21-29-249, and which shall otherwise conform with the provisions of this article.

Any member of said fire and/or police department who has been in, and has received compensation for, fire and/or police department service for twenty years before the filing of an application as hereinafter provided, with the preceding ten years of service being continuous in the city to which application is made, may file a written application for retirement relief. Thereupon, said board of disability and relief shall retire such member from active service without a medical examination of disability and shall order the monthly payment to him from said fund of an amount equal to fifty percent of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received as salary by him in the six-month period preceding the filing of such application. Thereafter, such payment, to be known as “retirement relief,” shall be made to such retired member for the remainder of his life.

Any member of said fire and/or police department who has been in, and has received compensation for, fire and/or police department service for more than twenty years shall be entitled to, and shall receive, additional retirement relief for the remainder of his life of an amount equal to one and seven-tenths percent of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by such member as salary in the six-month period preceding the filing of such application for each full year of service in excess of twenty years. However, such retired member shall receive the additional retirement relief provided in this paragraph only for each full year of service in excess of twenty years completed after July 1, 1966. No such retired member shall receive such additional retirement relief in excess of sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received as salary by him in the six-month period preceding the filing of such application, excluding such other benefits as may be hereinafter provided.

Any member of said fire and/or police department who (1) has been in, and has received compensation for, fire and/or police department service for a period equal to or greater than five years and less than twenty years, and (2) has been forced to retirement on account of age may file a written application for pro rata retirement relief. Thereupon, said disability and relief board shall retire such member from active service without a medical examination for disability and shall order the monthly payment to him from said fund of an amount equal to two and one-half percent of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received as salary by him in the six-month period preceding the filing of such application for each full year of active service.

Periods of time in which a member may have been inactive on account of physical or mental disability shall not be excluded in computing the hereinbefore-mentioned time periods, except that such periods of inactivity shall be excluded in computing the aforementioned five-year pro rata eligibility period. Periods of time in which a member may have been absent from such employment on account of active service in the Army or Navy of the United States, the United States Marine Corps or the United States Coast Guard between September 16, 1940, and July 25, 1947, or while as a civil employee engaged by the Army or Navy while serving outside the continental United States shall not be excluded in computing the hereinbefore-mentioned time period except that such periods of inactivity shall be excluded in computing the aforementioned five-year pro rata eligibility period. The discharge or release of such member from such armed forces shall have been under conditions other than dishonorable. Any member who has been retired or is voluntarily retired under this section, or who has received relief or disability benefits under this section, shall be required to report such duties as required by said disability and relief board.

The disability and relief board shall, when a member of the fire and/or police department completes thirty-five years of paid employment or attains the age of sixty, whichever occurs first, retire him from active service and order the payment of such funds as the member is entitled to under the provisions of this section. However, the continued employment of any member who has not completed twenty years of service may be authorized by the governing authority of the municipality on a year-to-year basis until the employee completes twenty years of active service or reaches the age of seventy, whichever occurs first.

Any person receiving retirement relief under the provisions of this section shall no longer be entitled to said relief upon attachment with a paid fire department or police department in another city having a paid retirement relief program for policemen or firemen.

The entitlement, under the particular retirement program in operation prior to the adoption of the alternative retirement program established in this section, of a policeman or fireman thereunder to any benefits or rights thereof shall not be diminished on account of the transition by such municipalities to the alternative retirement program established by this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-18.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 422, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1971.

§ 21-29-253.
Alternative program; refunds.

Any member of said fire and/or police department who ceases to be an employee thereof prior to becoming eligible for any retirement relief provided for in Section 21-29-251 may file a written application to said disability and relief board for a refund of any and all monies contributed to said fund by said member, and thereafter within one year shall receive, without interest, such monies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-18.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 422, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1971.

§ 21-29-255.
Death benefits.

[For any municipality that has not elected to authorize the continuation or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of the fire or police department dies in active service, or dies in inactive service on account of disability approved for disability relief under Section 21-29-241, as a result of injury received while in the discharge of duty in the service of the fire department or police department, or dies as a result of sickness or disease, due to the discharge of duty while in service as a member of the fire or police department, or if the member dies while entitled to relief after retirement under Section 21-29-245, the amount of disability relief or retirement relief being paid, or which should have been properly paid, shall continue to be paid from the fund to the spouse of the deceased member for the use of the spouse and the child, or children of the deceased member, so long as the spouse remains unmarried. If, after the marriage of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children. After the death or marriage of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father or a mother dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother, or both, so long as each lives. If there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the unmarried dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sister, all payments shall cease to her. Payments to dependents under this section are for services rendered to the members of the fire and/or police department, and the amount of payments is within the discretion of the board of disability and relief, but in no event shall the amount payable under this section be in excess of the amount that would have been payable as disability and relief to a member of the department.

If any member of the fire or police department dies while a member of the fire department or police department, and the member has not less than five (5) years’ service with the department, there shall be paid from the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund the following benefits:

For each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death; and

For each full year of active service in excess of twenty (20) years’ service, an additional payment in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1-7/10%) of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death (provided that no such payment shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding his or her death) to the spouse of the deceased member for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member, so long as the spouse remains unmarried and if, after the marriage of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children, and after the death or marriage of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father, mother or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives, or if there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, or dependent incurable children, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sisters, all payments shall cease to her.

For purposes of this section:

“Dependent” means wholly dependent.

“Child” or “children” means:

Children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18);

Children of the deceased member eighteen (18) years of age or older who have not yet reached their twenty-third birthday and are pursuing a full-time education; or

Children of the deceased member who, though eighteen (18) years of age or older, are wholly dependent upon the deceased member and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942 §§ 3487.5, 3494-19; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 17; Laws, 1962, ch. 546; Laws, 1974, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-255.
Death benefits.

[For any municipality that has elected to authorize the continuation or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of the fire or police department dies in active service, or dies in inactive service on account of disability approved for disability relief under Section 21-29-241, as a result of injury received while in the discharge of duty in the service of the fire department or police department, or dies as a result of sickness or disease, due to the discharge of duty while in service as a member of the fire or police department, or if the member dies while entitled to relief after retirement under Section 21-29-245, the amount of disability relief or retirement relief being paid, or which should have been properly paid, shall continue to be paid from the fund to the spouse of the deceased member for life for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse, but there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children. After the death of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father or a mother dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother, or both, so long as each lives, or if there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the unmarried dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sister, all payments shall cease to her. Payments to dependents under this section are for services rendered to the members of the fire and/or police department, and the amount of payments is within the discretion of the board of disability and relief, but in no event shall the amount payable under this section be in excess of the amount that would have been payable as disability and relief to a member of the department.

If any member of the fire or police department dies while a member of the fire department or police department, and the member has had not less than five (5) years’ service with the department, there shall be paid from the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund the following benefits:

For each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death; and

For each full year of active service in excess of twenty (20) years service, an additional payment in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1-7/10%) of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death (provided that no such payment shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding his or her death) to the spouse of the deceased member for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member, so long as the spouse lives and if, after the death of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children. After the death of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father, mother or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives, or if there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent sister or sisters of the deceased, or dependent incurable children, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remains unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sisters, all payments shall cease to her.

For the purposes of this section:

“Dependent” means wholly dependent.

“Child” or “children” means:

Children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18);

Children of the deceased member eighteen (18) years of age or older who have not yet reached their twenty-third birthday and are pursuing a full-time education; or

Children of the deceased member who, though eighteen (18) years of age or older, are wholly dependent upon the deceased and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942 §§ 3487.5, 3494-19; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 17; Laws, 1962, ch. 546; Laws, 1974, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-257.
Exemption from process.

No part of said fund to which any of said firemen or policemen shall be entitled, or which may be payable or ordered paid to him shall be seized, attached, assigned or levied upon by any writ of attachment, garnishment, execution, sequestration or other like process or writ.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-16; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 14; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 34, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-259.
Suit shall not be filed in cases of insufficient fund.

Should said fund at any time be insufficient to make all payments properly payable therefrom, the beneficiaries shall not file any suit against said city, its governing authorities, or said disability and relief board, but the amounts available shall be properly prorated until such time as funds may be sufficient to make all payments thereafter for the full amount properly allowed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-20; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 18.

§ 21-29-261.
Application of article.

This article shall apply to municipalities whether under private charter or existing and operating under the general statutes of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-23; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 21.